Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE D. DENTISTRY

CHAPTER 266. REGULATION OF DENTAL LABORATORIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 266.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 48(11), eff. September 1, 2017.

(2) "Dental laboratory" means a place in which a person performs or offers to perform a dental laboratory service.

(3) "Dental laboratory service" means:

(A) the making, assembly, processing, production, repair, relining, or adjustment of a prosthetic or orthodontic dental appliance, a full or partial denture, a fixed or removable dental bridge, a dental plate of false teeth, an artificial restoration, or a substitute or corrective device for any part of the human teeth, gums, jaws, or alveolar process; or

(B) the fitting of a dental appliance, a denture, a bridge, a plate, false teeth, an artificial restoration, or a substitute or corrective device for the human teeth, gums, or jaws to or on a dental model, impression, or cast of any part of the human teeth, gums, jaws, or alveolar process.

(4) "Dental technician" means a person who performs, offers to perform, or aids, abets, or causes another to perform or offer to perform a dental laboratory service.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 48(11), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 266.002. EXEMPTIONS. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a student enrolled in a program of a school of dentistry;

(2) a licensed dentist engaged in the practice of dentistry in this state who performs a dental laboratory service for compensation or an employee of the dentist or of the professional corporation or partnership in which the dentist is an officer, partner, or employee if the service is performed:

(A) for a patient of the dentist or of the professional corporation or partnership in which the dentist is an officer, partner, or employee; and

(B) on the premises in which the dentist practices dentistry; or

(3) a manufacturer of materials or component parts, used in the fabrication of a dental prosthetic appliance and for sale or use by a dental laboratory, that are not directly fitted to a dental model or cast of the human teeth, gums, jaws, or alveolar process.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER C. BOARD POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 266.102. BOARD POWERS AND DUTIES.

(a) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 48(14), eff. September 1, 2017.

(b) The board may adopt rules regarding dental laboratories in only the following areas:

(1) processing registration applications;

(2) prescribing:

(A) requirements for registration;

(B) the form and content of registration applications and other forms required to administer this chapter;

(C) procedures for renewal of certificates of registration; and

(D) fees necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) monitoring records necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) establishing continuing education requirements for dental technicians employed by dental laboratories, including prescribing the content of continuing education courses; and

(5) regulating:

(A) infection control;

(B) shade-taking procedures authorized by a prescription from a licensed dentist;

(C) computer-imaging procedures for an oral cavity authorized by a prescription from a licensed dentist;

(D) referral of dental prescriptions to out-of-state laboratories to be filled; and

(E) the transportation and manufacture of dental prosthetic devices or other dental work performed by a dental laboratory located in another state or a foreign country for use in this state.

(c) In prescribing the content of continuing education courses under Subsection (b)(4), the board shall require the course content to be at least as comprehensive as a course approved by a recognized board of certification for dental technology.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 48(14), eff. September 1, 2017.

(e) The board shall provide annually to each dentist licensed in this state a list of dental laboratories registered under this chapter. The list must include the expiration date of each laboratory's registration certificate.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 48(14), eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER D. CERTIFICATION, REGISTRATION, AND RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 266.151. REGISTRATION REQUIRED. (a) In this section, "person" means an individual or a private legal entity, including a corporation, association, or partnership.

(b) A person may not operate or offer to operate a dental laboratory or provide or offer to provide dental laboratory services unless the person holds a registration certificate issued under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 266.152. CERTIFIED DENTAL TECHNICIAN. (a) A dental laboratory must have at least one dental technician working on the laboratory's premises who is certified by a recognized board of certification for dental technology.

(b) A dental laboratory is exempt from Subsection (a) if the laboratory is:

(1) owned by a licensed dentist engaged in the practice of dentistry in this state or by a professional corporation or partnership in which that dentist is an officer, partner, or employee; and

(2) located on the premises within which the dentist practices dentistry.

(c) The exemption under Subsection (b) does not apply to a dental laboratory if the laboratory employs three or more dental technicians.

(d) The owner of a dental laboratory registered with the board on September 1, 1987, is exempt from Subsection (a) if:

(1) the registration of the laboratory has been timely renewed since that date, and all registration fees have been paid;

(2) the beneficial ownership of at least 51 percent of the laboratory has not been transferred; and

(3) the owner is employed on the laboratory's premises for not less than 30 hours each week.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.094(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 44, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 266.153. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION; TERM. (a) An owner or manager of a dental laboratory shall:

(1) apply to the board for the registration of each dental laboratory doing business in this state to which the owner or manager is connected or in which the owner or manager has an interest; and

(2) pay the application fee set by the board.

(b) The application must include:

(1) evidence satisfactory to the board that the dental laboratory meets the requirements prescribed by Section 266.152(a), if applicable; and

(2) any other information required by the board.

(c) The board may issue a certificate of registration only to a dental laboratory that complies with the requirements of this section.

(d) A dental laboratory registration issued under this chapter is valid for a term of one or two years, as determined by board rule.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 45, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 46, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 266.154. REGISTRATION RENEWAL. (a) An applicant for renewal of a dental laboratory registration must provide evidence satisfactory to the board that at least one employee who works on the dental laboratory's premises:

(1) has completed the minimum number of hours of continuing education during the previous registration period as required by board rule; or

(2) is certified as required by Section 266.152(a), if applicable.

(b) An owner or manager of a dental laboratory may renew an unexpired registration certificate for a dental laboratory if the owner or manager:

(1) pays the required renewal fee to the board on or before the expiration date; and

(2) complies with any other renewal requirements.

(c) If the owner or manager of a dental laboratory fails to renew the dental laboratory's registration and pay the renewal fee before the date the registration expires, the board shall suspend the registration certificate of the laboratory.

(d) An owner or manager of a dental laboratory whose registration certificate has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the registration certificate if the person pays to the board the required renewal fee and a fee equal to one-half of the amount of the renewal fee. If the registration certificate has been expired for more than 90 days but less than one year, the owner or manager may renew the certificate by paying to the board all unpaid renewal fees and a fee equal to the amount of the initial registration fee.

(e) An owner or manager of a dental laboratory may not renew a registration certificate that has been expired for one year or more. The owner or manager may obtain a new certificate by complying with the requirements for obtaining an original certificate.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.094(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 47, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 266.155. INITIAL REGISTRATION CERTIFICATE FEE. An initial registration certificate issued under this subchapter expires on the 30th day after the date the registration certificate is issued if the holder of the registration certificate fails to pay the required registration certificate fee on or before that date.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (S.B. 887), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER E. PRACTICE BY REGISTRATION HOLDER

Sec. 266.201. PRESCRIPTION REQUIRED. (a) A dentist who orders a dental laboratory service shall prepare and deliver to the dental laboratory a prescription or work order for the service to be performed.

(b) The prescription or work order must contain:

(1) the signature and Texas dental license number of the dentist;

(2) the date the prescription or work order is signed;

(3) the patient's name; and

(4) a description of the dental laboratory service ordered.

(c) A dentist shall keep a copy of each prescription or work order at the dentist's office in a separate file for two years for inspection by the board's officers, agents, or employees.

(d) A dentist shall label as provided by board rule a removable dental prosthesis fabricated in this state by the dentist or by a person under a prescription or work order prepared by the dentist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1240, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 266.202. RELIANCE ON PRESCRIPTION. (a) The owner, manager, or employee of a dental laboratory or a dental technician may not perform or aid or abet another person in performing a dental laboratory service unless:

(1) the service was ordered by and any resulting item will be delivered to:

(A) a dentist engaged in the practice of dentistry in this state or in a jurisdiction in which the dentist maintains a dental office and engages in the practice of dentistry; or

(B) an employee of the dentist, if the service is performed for and on behalf of the dentist; and

(2) the dental laboratory receives a prescription or work order for the service in accordance with Section 266.201.

(b) If a dental laboratory receives a prescription or work order for dental laboratory services and refers the work to another laboratory, the referral must be accompanied by a written statement that the prescription or work order is on file with the original laboratory.

(c) A dental laboratory owner or manager shall maintain on the premises of a dental laboratory as a part of the laboratory's records a record of each prescription or work order completed at the dental laboratory until the second anniversary of the date the prescription or work order is furnished. The owner or manager shall also maintain the record in an alphabetized file in a separate place.

(d) The premises of a dental laboratory, the records of a dental laboratory or a dental technician employed by the dental laboratory pertaining to dental prescriptions or work orders, and records relating to the referral of work to a dental technician or the owner or manager of a dental laboratory shall be open and available for inspection by a member, officer, employee, investigator, or agent of the board during regular office hours.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 266.203. TRANSPORTATION OF DENTAL MATERIAL PERMITTED. This chapter does not prohibit a person who is subject to and complies with this chapter from using the United States mail, a railway express agency, Western Union, or a messenger or common or contract carrier to handle, accept from, or transport or deliver to a dentist or dental laboratory an item in any form or state of completion on which a dental laboratory service will be or has been offered or ordered to be performed.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER F. DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS

Sec. 266.251. GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. (a) The board may refuse to issue a registration certificate, may impose a fine on a person who holds a registration certificate, may suspend or revoke a person's registration certificate, or may probate any portion of the suspension if, after a hearing, the board determines that the applicant or certificate holder has:

(1) violated or aided another person in violating a law regulating the practice of dentistry; or

(2) required or allowed a person under the direction or control of the person to violate a law regulating the practice of dentistry.

(b) In this section, an applicant for or holder of a registration certificate includes a person who has at least a 20 percent ownership interest in or is the general partner or managing partner in a dental laboratory that is registered under this chapter or for which an application for registration has been filed.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 266.252. PROCEDURES FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. The board shall follow the procedures under Chapter 263 in a complaint or disciplinary action under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER G. PROHIBITED PRACTICES, ENFORCEMENT, AND PENALTIES

Sec. 266.301. DENTAL PROSTHETIC APPLIANCE. (a) In this section, "person" means an individual or a private legal entity, including a corporation, association, or partnership.

(b) A person may not fill a prescription to prepare or repair a dental prosthetic appliance that is to be delivered to a dental patient by a licensed dentist unless the person is a dental laboratory or dental technician.

(c) A dental laboratory that prepares or repairs a dental prosthetic appliance for a dentist shall provide to the dentist in writing at the time of the delivery the dental laboratory's assigned registration number and the expiration date of the dental laboratory's registration certificate.

(d) A dentist may not knowingly prescribe, order, or receive a dental prosthetic appliance that is to be prepared or has been prepared by an unregistered dental laboratory.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 266.302. INJUNCTION. The board may apply for a restraining order or injunction to enforce this chapter or a board rule adopted under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 266.303. CRIMINAL PENALTIES. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) is a dentist and provides a dental laboratory service without being exempt under Section 266.002(2); or

(2) violates Section 266.151 or 266.301.

(b) An offense for a violation of Section 266.151 or Section 266.301(b) is a felony of the third degree.

(c) An offense for a violation of Section 266.301(c) is a Class C misdemeanor. If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the defendant has previously been convicted for an offense for a violation of Section 266.301(c), the offense is a Class A misdemeanor.

(d) An offense for a violation of Section 266.301(d) is a Class B misdemeanor. If it is shown on the trial of an offense under this section that the defendant has previously been convicted of an offense for a violation of Section 266.301(d), the offense is a Class A misdemeanor.

(e) Each day of a violation is a separate offense.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (S.B. 887), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.